Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB835.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 771(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 771. Display of United States Flag; Development of Patriotism.--(a) The board of school directors in each district shall, when they are not otherwise provided, purchase a United States flag, flagstaff, and the necessary appliances therefor, and shall display said flag upon or near each public school building in clement weather, during school hours, and at such other times as the board may determine. When the United States flag is displayed in accordance with this section, the official 1234567891011121314151617181920 POW/MIA flag shall also be displayed where it can be reasonably accommodated.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0835PN0928 - 2 - 1234